Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3503
Employer; prohibited acts.

No employer shall:

(1) Require or request that an employee or applicant provide or disclose any user name or password or any other related account information in order to gain access to the employee's or applicant's personal Internet account by way of an electronic communication device;

(2) Require or request that an employee or applicant log into a personal Internet account by way of an electronic communication device in the presence of the employer in a manner that enables the employer to observe the contents of the employee’s or applicant’s personal Internet account or provides the employer access to the employee's or applicant's personal Internet account;

(3) Require an employee or applicant to add anyone, including the employer, to the list of contacts associated with the employee's or applicant’s personal Internet account or require or otherwise coerce an employee or applicant to change the settings on the employee's or applicant's personal Internet account which affects the ability of others to view the content of such account; or

(4) Take adverse action against, fail to hire, or otherwise penalize an employee or applicant for failure to provide or disclose any of the information or to take any of the actions specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this section.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 3.